bg-BG: Покритие на струните за китара: Обработка против ръжда; С покритие (nanoweb/тънко); С покритие (optweb/ултратънко); С покритие (полимерно); Без покритие; Други
sv: Gitarrsträngbeläggning: Rostskyddsbehandlad; Belagd (nanoweb/tunn); Belagd (optweb/ultratunn); Belagd (polymer); Obelagd; Övrigt
th: การเคลือบสายกีตาร์: ผ่านการเคลือบกันสนิม; เคลือบ (นาโนเว็บ/บาง); เคลือบ (ออปติเว็บ/บางพิเศษ); เคลือบ (โพลีเมอร์); ไม่เคลือบ; อื่นๆ
hu: Gitárhúr bevonata: Rozsdásodásgátlóval kezelt; Bevonatos (nanoweb/vékony); Bevonatos (optiweb/ultravékony); Bevonatos (polimer); Bevonat nélküli; Egyéb
pt-PT: Revestimento de guitarra cadeia: Tratamento antiferrugem; Com revestimento (nanoweb/fino); Com revestimento (optiweb/ultrafino); Com revestimento (polímero); Sem revestimento; Outro
en: Guitar string coating: Anti-rust treated; Coated (nanoweb/thin); Coated (optweb/ultra-thin); Coated (polymer); Uncoated; Other
ru: Покрытие гитарных струн: Антикоррозийная обработка; С покрытием (Nanoweb/тонкое); С покрытием (optweb/ультратонкое); С покрытием (полимер); Без покрытия; Другое
pt-BR: Guitarra corda revestimento: Tratada contra ferrugem; Revestida (nanoweb/fina); Revestida (optiweb/ultrafina); Revestida (polímero); Não revestida; Outra
sl-SI: Premaz kitarskih strun: Obdelano proti rji; Premazano (nanoweb/tanko); Premazano (optiweb/izjemno tanko); Premazano (polimer); Nepremazano; Drugo
el: Επίστρωση χορδών κιθάρας: Με αντισκωριακή επεξεργασία; Με επίστρωση (nanoweb/λεπτή); Με επίστρωση (optweb/πολύ λεπτή); Με επίστρωση (πολυμερές); Χωρίς επίστρωση; Άλλο
da: Belægning på guitarstrenge: Antirustbehandlet; Belagt (nanoweb/tynd); Belagt (optweb/ultratynd); Belagt (polymer); Ubelagt; Andet
pl: Powłoka strun gitarowych: Z powłoką antykorozyjną; Powlekane (nanoweb/cienkie); Powlekane (optweb/bardzo cienkie); Powlekane (polimerowe); Niepowlekane; Inne
lt-LT: Gitaros stygų danga: Apsaugota nuo rūdžių; Su danga („Nanoweb“ / plona); Su danga („Optiweb“ / itin plona); Su danga (polimerine); Be dangos; Kita
it: Rivestimento per le corde della chitarra: Trattamento antiruggine; Rivestito (nanoweb/sottile); Rivestito (optweb/ultrasottile); Con rivestimento (polimero); Non rivestita; Altro
sk-SK: Povlak gitarovej struny: Ošetrené proti hrdzi; Potiahnuté (nanoweb/tenké); Potiahnuté (optweb/ultratenké); Potiahnuté (polymér); Nepotiahnuté; Iné
tr: Gitar tel kaplaması: Pas önleyici işlem görmüş; Kaplamalı (nanoweb/ince); Kaplamalı (optweb/ultra ince); Kaplamalı (polimer); Kaplamasız; Diğer
nb: Gitarstyrkebelegg: Antirustbehandlet; Belagt (nanoweb / tynn); Belagt (optiweb / ultratynn); Belagt (polymer); Ubelagt; Annet
vi: Lớp phủ dây đàn guitar: Đã xử lý chống gỉ; Phủ lớp (nanoweb/mỏng); Phủ lớp (optweb/siêu mỏng); Phủ (polymer); Không phủ; Khác
zh-CN: 吉他琴弦涂层: 防锈处理; 涂层（Nanoweb/薄涂层）; 涂层（Optweb/超薄）; 涂层（聚合物）; 无涂层; 其他
zh-TW: 吉他弦塗層: 防鏽處理; 有塗層 (奈米/薄); 有塗層 (Optiweb/超薄); 有塗層 (聚合物); 無塗層; 其他
fi: Kitaran kielten pinnoite: Ruosteenestokäsitelty; Päällystetty (nanoweb/ohut); Päällystetty (optweb / erittäin ohut); Päällystetty (polymeeri); Päällystämätön; Muu
es: Recubrimiento de las cuerdas de guitarra: Tratamiento antioxidante; Recubierto (nanoweb/fino); Recubierto (optweb/ultrafino); Revestida (polímero); Sin revestir; Otra
de: Beschichtung der Gitarrensaiten: Rostschutzbehandelt; Beschichtet (Nanoweb/dünn); Beschichtet (Optiweb/hauchdünn); Beschichtet (Polymer); Unbeschichtet; Sonstige
fr: Revêtement des cordes de guitare: Traité antirouille; Revêtement (nanoweb/fin); Revêtement (optweb/ultra-fin); Enduit (polymère); Non enduit; Autre
ro-RO: Strat de acoperire al corzilor de chitară: Tratate antirugină; Acoperite (nanoweb/subțire); Acoperite (optiweb/ultrasubțire); Acoperite (polimer); Neacoperite; Altele
hr-HR: Premaz za gitaru: Obrađeno protiv hrđe; Obloženo (nanoweb / tanko); Obloženo (optweb / iznimno tanko); Obloženo (polimer); Neobloženo; Ostalo
cs: Povlak na struny kytary: S antikorozní úpravou; Potažené (nanoweb/tenké); Potažené (optweb / ultra tenké); Potažené (polymer); Nepotažené; Jiné
ko: 기타 스트링 코팅: 방청 처리됨; 코팅됨(나노웹/얇음); 코팅됨(옵티웹/초박형); 코팅(폴리머); 비코팅; 기타
nl: Gitaarsnaar coating: Roestwerend behandeld; Gecoat (nanoweb/dun); Gecoat (optweb/ultradun); Gecoat (polymeer); Ongecoat; Overig
ja: ギターストリングコーティング: 防錆処理; コーティング (ナノウェブ/極薄); コーティング (オプトウェブ/超極薄); コーティングあり (ポリマー); コーティングなし; その他